Tennessee, session 114, SB2497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Healthcare facility":
(A) Means an institution, place, building, or agency represented
and held out to the general public as ready, willing, and able to furnish
care, accommodations, facilities, and equipment for the use, in
connection with the services of a physician or dentist, of one (1) or more
nonrelated persons who may be suffering from deformity, injury, or
disease or from any other condition for which nursing, medical, or surgical
services would be appropriate for care, diagnosis, or treatment; and
(B) Does include a hospital or institution, operated by the
department of mental health and substance abuse services or the
department of disability and aging, specifically intended for use in the
diagnosis, care, and treatment of those suffering from mental illness,
intellectual disabilities, convulsive disorders, or other abnormal mental
conditions;
(2) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine pursuant to
title 63, chapter 6, or osteopathic medicine pursuant to title 63, chapter 9; and
SB2497
011893
- 1 -

(3) "Shelter" includes:
(A) A public or private nonprofit facility that provides temporary
housing and related services to persons experiencing homelessness; and
(B) A public or private nonprofit facility that provides temporary
housing and related services to persons who have experienced domestic
violence.
(b) The bureau of immigration and customs enforcement of the United States
department of homeland security is prohibited from entering into and conducting law
enforcement activities in a healthcare facility, physician's office, or a shelter located in
this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011893